Arkansas, session 2025, HB1336.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:


SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-6-504(3), concerning employer
contributions to the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred
Retirement Option Plan, is amended to read as follows:
(3) Seventy-two percent (72%) One hundred percent (100%) of the
monthly retirement benefits that would have been payable had the employee
elected to cease employment and receive a service retirement shall be paid
into the Arkansas State Police Officers' Tier Two Deferred Retirement Option
Plan account.
*LJH112*
04-02-2025 09:45:58 LJH112

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/2/25 HB1336

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-53-210(b), concerning the partial
reimbursement to the Division of Arkansas State Police for the cost of making
copies of motor vehicle accident reports and records of traffic violations,
is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1)(A) In Except as provided in subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this
section, in order to partially reimburse the division for the cost of making
photostatic or written copies of motor vehicle accident reports and copies of
records of traffic violations, there shall be charged a fee of ten dollars
($10.00) twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for each copy of a basic accident
report and a fee of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per page for
each copy of a supplemental report.
(B) The fee charged for a copy of a basic accident report
under subdivision (b)(1)(A) of this section shall be ten dollars ($10.00) for
a person who was involved in the accident for which the basic accident report
was generated.
(2) All funds collected under this subsection shall immediately
be paid over by the division to the Treasurer of State and shall be credited
by him or her as a special revenue to the Division of Arkansas State Police
Fund with:
(A) Ten dollars ($10.00) to be used for operations; and
(B)(i) Fifteen dollars ($15.00) to be used for the
benefits under §§ 24-6-216, 24-6-408, and 24-6-504.
(ii) The transfers under subdivision (b)(2)(B)(i) of
this section shall be limited in use solely for the purpose of funding the
State Police Retirement System.


SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the
Arkansas Code concerning the State Police Retirement System are in need of
revision and updating to maintain the retirement laws in conformance with
sound public pension policy; that the State Police Retirement System operates
on a fiscal year of July 1 to June 30; that having a July 1, 2025, effective
date is necessary to allow the provisions within this act to begin on the
first day of the fiscal year to provide proper administration of the
04-02-2025 09:45:58 LJH112

As Engrossed: H3/31/25 H4/2/25 HB1336
procedures herein; that such revisions and updating are of great importance
for actuarial purposes and to protect the benefits to members of the State
Police Retirement System; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain
an orderly system of benefits for the members of the State Police Retirement
System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on July 1, 2025.

/s/Warren



























04-02-2025 09:45:58 LJH112